rus.twol
Alphabet

А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я

г:ж



Rules

"Г turns to ж before soft vowels"
г:ж => _ е ;


"Transformation before н"
C1:C2 => _ н ;
      where
          C1 in ( г х ц к )
          C2 in ( ж ш ч ч ) matched ;
